Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Standards of Conduct

48-58-301. General standards for directors.

A director shall discharge all duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging such duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence;

A committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member, as to matters within its jurisdiction, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence; or

One (1) or more volunteers of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

A director is not acting in good faith if the director has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director or any failure to take action, if the director performed the duties of the office in compliance with this section, or if the director is immune from suit under § 48-58-601.

A director shall not be deemed to be a trustee with respect to the corporation or with respect to any property held or administered by the corporation, including without limitation, property that may be subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of such property.

In discharging board or committee duties a director must disclose, or cause to be disclosed, to the other board or committee members information not already known by the other board or committee members but known by the director to be material to the discharge of their decision-making or oversight functions, except that disclosure is not required to the extent that the director reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed by law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality, or a professional ethics rule.

A director may rely, in the case of a corporation engaged in religious activity, on religious authorities, religious leaders or other persons whose positions or duties the director reasonably believes justify reliance and confidence and whom the director believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.30; 2014, ch. 899, §§ 37, 38.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 57, 64, 65.

48-58-302. Personal liability of director — Enforcement.

Unless the director complies with the applicable standards of conduct described in § 48-58-301, a director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of chapters 51-68 of this title or the charter is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating chapters 51-68 of this title or the charter.

A director held liable for an unlawful distribution under subsection (a) is entitled to contribution from:

Every other director who voted for or assented to the distribution without complying with the applicable standards of conduct described in § 48-58-301; and

Each person who received an unlawful distribution for the amount of the distribution, whether or not the person receiving the distribution knew it was made in violation of chapters 51-68 of this title or the charter.

A proceeding to enforce:

The liability of a director under subsection (a) is barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the liability of such director has been finally adjudicated; and

Contribution or recoupment under subsection (b) is barred unless it is commenced within one (1) year after the liability of the claimant has been finally adjudicated.

Commencement of actions described in § 48-58-601 shall be governed by such section.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.31; 2014, ch. 899, § 39.

Attorney General Opinions. Conflicts of interest involving downtown development entities and directors, OAG 99-043, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (2/25/99).

48-58-303. Loans to or guarantees for directors and officers.

A corporation may not lend money to or guarantee the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation.

This section does not apply to loans and guarantees authorized or permitted by any other statute that regulates any special class of corporation.

This section does not apply to:

Advances to pay reimbursable expenses reasonably expected to be incurred by a director or officer;

Advances to pay premiums on life insurance if the advance is secured by the cash value of the policy;

Advances pursuant to part 5 of this chapter;

Loans or advances pursuant to employee benefit plans; or

Loans to pay relocation expenses.

Neither a sale on credit in the ordinary course of business nor a life insurance policy loan shall be subject to the restrictions of this section.

The fact that a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section does not affect the borrower's liability on the loan.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.32; 2014, ch. 899, § 40.

Cross-References. Qualified applicability of Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-58-304. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.33; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 41, effective January 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 48-58-304 concerned liability for unlawful distributions.